Utah statutes.
78A-2-202.   Courts of justice -- Authority.
(1)  All courts of justice have the authority necessary to exercise their
jurisdiction.
(2)  If a procedure for an action is not established, a process may be adopted
that conforms with the apparent intent of the statute or rule of procedure.
